Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 25.30.900.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 4 ch 133 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 25.30.901.
Application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact laws substantially similar.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.903.
Severability clause.

If a provision of this chapter or its application to a person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and, to this end, the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.909.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“abandoned” means left without provision for reasonable and necessary care or supervision;

“child” means an individual who has not attained 18 years of age;

“child custody determination” means a judgment, decree, or other order of a court providing for the legal custody, physical custody, or visitation with respect to a child, including a permanent, temporary, initial, and modification order, except that the term does not include an order relating to child support or other monetary obligation of an individual;

“child custody proceeding” means a proceeding in which legal custody, physical custody, or visitation with respect to a child is an issue, including a proceeding for divorce, separation, neglect, abuse, dependency, guardianship, paternity, termination of parental rights, and protection from domestic violence in which the issue may appear, except that the term does not include a proceeding involving juvenile delinquency, contractual emancipation, or enforcement under AS

25.30.400

—

25.30.590

or provisions substantially similar to AS

25.30.400

—

25.30.590

;

“commencement” means the filing of the first pleading in a proceeding;

“court” means an entity authorized under the law of a state to establish, enforce, or modify a child custody determination;

“home state” means the state in which a child lived with a parent or a person acting as a parent for at least six consecutive months, including any temporary absences of the child or parent or person acting as a parent, immediately before the commencement of a child custody proceeding, except that, in the case of a child who is less than six months of age, the term means the state in which the child lived from birth with any of the persons mentioned, including any temporary absences;

“initial determination” means the first child custody determination concerning a particular child;

“issuing court” means the court that makes a child custody determination for which enforcement is sought under this chapter;

“issuing state” means the state in which a child custody determination is made;

“modification” means a child custody determination that changes, replaces, supersedes, or is otherwise made after a previous determination concerning the same child, whether or not it is made by the court that made the previous determination;

“person” means a natural person, a corporation, a business trust, an estate, a trust, a partnership, a limited liability company, an association, a joint venture, a government or a governmental subdivision, an agency, an instrumentality, a public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“person acting as a parent” means a person, other than a parent, who

has physical custody of a child or has had physical custody for a period of six consecutive months, including temporary absence, within one year immediately before the commencement of a child custody proceeding; and

has been awarded legal custody by a court or claims a right to legal custody under the law of this state;

“physical custody” means the physical care and supervision of a child;

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“warrant” means an order issued by a court authorizing law enforcement officers to take physical custody of a child.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.910.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 61 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Cited

in

Fox v. Grace, 435 P.3d 883 (Alaska 2018).